Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 19.
PASSAGE OF LAWS (CONST., ART. 5, §§ [37]-[41] ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment added five sections to Ark. Const., Art. 5 which appear as §§ [37]-[41] of that article. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1933 regular session (see Acts 1933, p. 877), voted upon at the general election on Nov. 6, 1934, and adopted by a vote of 99,223 for and 25,496 against.